Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.7. A. Each school district may offer to three-
and four-year-old children the opportunity to participate in an
early childhood education program.
B. The State Board of Education shall promulgate standards for
early childhood education programs for children who are at least
four (4) three (3) years of age but not more than five (5) years of
age on or before September 1 of the ensuing school year. The
standards shall include both half-day programs consisting of not
Req. No. 12777 Page 1

less than two and one-half (2 1/2) hours per school day, and full-
day programs of six (6) hours. The standards for all early
childhood education programs shall require a certified teacher, as
specified in this section, to be present in the classroom for the
length of the school day. Such program shall:
1. Be directed toward developmentally appropriate objectives
for such children, rather than toward academic objectives suitable
for older children;
2. Accommodate the needs of all children and families
regardless of socioeconomic circumstances; and
3. Require that any teacher employed by a public school to
teach in such early childhood education program shall be certified
in early childhood education.
C. The superintendent of any school district providing
classroom space or other school facilities for a federally sponsored
Head Start program that is planning to make a material change in the
arrangement, shall give notice to the director of the Head Start
program at least seven (7) days prior to a school board hearing on
the matter.
D. A school district may offer such early childhood education
program within the district, in cooperation with other districts,
through the use of transfers as specified by law, or by contracting
with a private or public provider of early childhood education
programs, or by contracting for classroom space with a licensed
Req. No. 12777 Page 2

publ ic or private child care provider based upon selection criteria
established by the district. If the program is provided through
contract with a private or public provider other than a school
district, the contract may only be continued if each teacher serving
the school on and after January 1, 1993, is certified in early
childhood education, except that all teachers, without such
certification, hired by such provider prior to January 1, 1993, and
serving in the school as an early childhood education teacher shall
be required to obtain certification on or before the beginning of
the 1996-97 school year. Any person who has been employed as an
early childhood educator with the Head Start Program, has a child
development associate degree (CDA) and has at least five (5) years
of experience in such employment shall be certified in early
childhood education for purposes of employment in the public schools
of this state to teach in early childhood education for children
four (4) years of age and younger; if such person is recertified in
child development by the Council for Early Childhood Professional
Recognition within five (5) years prior to the expiration of the
person's early childhood certificate that was issued by the State
Board of Education, such person shall be granted a renewal
certificate in early childhood education by the State Board of
Education upon expiration of the early childhood certificate.
Provided, private or public providers shall meet such other
standards required by law and by the State Board of Education.
Req. No. 12777 Page 3

E. If an early childhood program is provided by a private or
public provider pursuant to a contract as authorized in this
section, the contract shall address the requirements for
implementing the induction program as required in Section 6-195 of
this title. Teachers employed by a private or public provider in an
early childhood education program provided through contract with a
public school district shall receive in salary and/or fringe
benefits amounts not less than the amounts specified in the schedule
set forth in Section 18-114.14 18-114.15 of this title.
F. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
provide for the implementation of such program.
G. An early childhood education program may be offered jointly
by school districts that have formed interlocal cooperative
agreements pursuant to Section 5-117b of this title.
H. The term "prekindergarten" shall mean early childhood
education for purposes of this title.
I. The State Board of Education shall ensure that the standards
for early childhood education are aligned with any new subject
matter standards adopted pursuant to Section 11-103.6a of this
title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1-114, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 258, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1-114), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 12777 Page 4

Section 1-114. A. All children between the ages of five (5)
years on or before September 1 and twenty-one (21) years on or
before September 1 shall be entitled to attend school free of charge
in the district in which they reside.
B. All children who are at least four (4) three (3) years of
age but not more than five (5) years of age on or before September 1
and who have not attended a public school kindergarten shall be
entitled to attend half-day or full-day early childhood programs at
any public school in the state where such programs are offered;
provided, no child shall be required to attend any early childhood
education program. The following paragraphs shall govern early
childhood programs:
1. Children who are at least four (4) three (3) years of age
but not more than five (5) years of age on or before September 1
shall be entitled to attend either half-day or full-day early
childhood programs in their district of residence free of charge as
long as the district has the physical facilities and teaching
personnel to accommodate the child. For purposes of calculation of
State Aid, children in an early childhood education program shall be
included in the average daily membership of the district providing
the program;
2. A child who has not reached the age of five (5) years on or
before September 1 and who resides in a district which does not
offer an early childhood program shall be eligible for transfer to a
Req. No. 12777 Page 5

dist rict where an early childhood program is offered if the district
that offers the early childhood program has the capacity to accept
the child as provided for in the Education Open Transfer Act. A
district offering early childhood programs may refuse to accept a
nonresident child if the district does not have the capacity to
accommodate the child in an early childhood education class, as
provided for in the Education Open Transfer Act. If the child
requesting the transfer has not reached the age of four (4) three
(3) years on or before September 1, the district may refuse to
accept the nonresident child if the district determines the child is
not ready for an early childhood program. Children who are accepted
in a program outside their district of residence as provided in this
paragraph shall be included in the average daily membership of the
district providing the program for State Aid funding subject to the
State Aid formula weight limitations set forth in paragraph 1 of
this subsection; and
3. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules that
create exemptions relating to the maximum age at which a child may
attend half-day or full-day early childhood programs.
C. No child shall be enrolled in kindergarten unless he or she
will have reached the age of five (5) years on or before September 1
of the school year. No child shall be enrolled in the first grade
unless he or she will have reached the age of six (6) years on or
before September 1 of the school year.
Req. No. 12777 Page 6

D. 1. No nonresident and nontransferred pupil shall be allowed
to attend school in any school district unless a tuition fee equal
to the per capita cost of education for a similar period in such
district during the preceding year has been paid to the receiving
district in advance yearly or by semester as determined by the
district board of education of the receiving district. If the State
Board of Education discovers that the attendance has been allowed
without prior payment of the tuition fee in advance as required, no
further payment of any State Aid funds shall be made to the district
until the district has shown to the satisfaction of the State Board
of Education that all tuition fees have been paid or that the pupil
will no longer be allowed to attend school until the required
tuition fee has been paid.
2. The provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall not
apply to a school district that enrolls nonresident students from a
contiguous, out-of-state school district if the district:
a. does not receive payment of any State Aid funds, and
b. has a per-pupil expenditure, as defined by Section 1-
124 of this title, that is above the state average
per-pupil expenditure.
A nonresident student whose resident district, as determined by
Section 1-113 of this title, is not within this state shall not be
eligible for State Aid. No local funding associated with the

Req. No. 12777 Page 7

nonr esident student's out-of-state resident district shall be
allocated or transferred to the receiving school district.
E. Any parent, guardian, person, or institution having care and
custody of a child who pays ad valorem tax on real property in any
other school district other than that in which that person resides
may, with the approval of the receiving school district, enroll the
child in any school district in which ad valorem tax is paid and
receive a credit on the nonresident tuition fee equal to the amount
of the ad valorem tax paid for school district purposes in the
school district in which the child is enrolled. Provided, the
credit shall not exceed the total amount required for the tuition
payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12777 AQH 02/20/25





Req. No. 12777 Page 8